en: Carbon compensated product, carbon neutral
fr: Produit compensé carbone, Carbone neutre, neutre en carbone, carbone compensé

en: Cooperative product
es: Producto de cooperativa
fr: Produit en coopérative, produit de coopérative

en: ISO 9001
xx: ISO 9001
fr: Iso 9001, Certifie iso 9001, La certification qualite iso 9001
it: Iso 9001, Uni en iso 9001, Sistema di qualita certificato iso 9001

en: ISO-9001-2008, ISO 9001 2008 certified qms
xx: ISO-9001-2008
it: Iso-9001-2008

en: EU Agriculture, European Union agriculture
de: EU-Landwirtschaft
es: Agricultura UE, Agricultura Unión Europea
fr: Agriculture UE, Agriculture Union Européeenne

en: Fair trade
es: Comercio justo, Fairtrade-Comercio Justo
fr: Commerce équitable, équitable

en: Fairtrade International, Fairtrade, FLO international, FLO
es: Fairtrade International, Fairtrade, FLO international, FLO
fr: Fairtrade International, Fairtrade, FLO international, FLO

en: TransFer, TransFer Canada
xx: TransFer, TransFer Canada

en: New
bg: Ново
ca: Nou
da: Nyhed, Ny
de: Neu
es: Nuevo
fi: Uutuus, uusi
fr: Nouveau
he: חדש
hu: Új
it: Nuovo
nl: Nieuw
pl: Nowość, Nowy, Nowe
pt: Novo, novidade
ru: Новинка
sv: Nyhet
th: สินค้าใหม่
tr: Yeni

en: Without paraben, Paraben-free, No paraben, No parabens
bg: Без парабени
cs: Bez parabenů
da: Uden parabener
de: Ohne paraben, Parabenfrei
el: Χωρίς παραβένες
es: Sin Parabenos
et: Parabeenivaba
fi: Ilman parabeeneja
fr: Sans paraben, Sans parabenes, 0 parabens, 0 paraben, Sans parabene, Sans parabens, Zero paraben
he: ללא פרבנים
hr: Bez parabena
hu: Parabénmentes
id: Tanpa paraben
is: Án parabena
it: Senza parabeni
ja: パラベン不使用
nl: Zonder parabeen
pt: Sem parabenos, livre de parabenos

en: Without paraffins
ar: بدون بارافين
az: Parafinsiz
bg: Без парафини
bn: প্যারাফিন ছাড়া
cs: Bez parafínů
da: Uden paraffiner
de: Ohne Paraffine
el: Χωρίς παραφίνες
es: Sin parafinas
et: Parafiinivaba
fa: بدون پارافین
fi: Ilman parafiineja
fr: Sans paraffines, sans paraffine
ga: Gan paraifíní
gu: પેરાફીન વગર
he: ללא פרפינים
hr: Bez parafina
hu: Paraffin nélkül
id: Tanpa parafin
is: Án paraffíns
it: Senza paraffina
ja: パラフィン不使用
ka: პარაფინის გარეშე
kk: Парафинсіз
km: គ្មានប៉ារ៉ាហ្វីន
kn: ಪ್ಯಾರಾಫಿನ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 파라핀 없음
ky: Парафинсиз
lt: Be parafino
lv: Bez parafīna
ml: പാരാഫിനുകൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Парафин байхгүй
mr: पॅराफिनशिवाय
ms: Tanpa parafin
mt: Mingħajr paraffini
ne: प्याराफिन बिना
nl: Zonder paraffine
no: Uten parafin
or: ପାରାଫିନ୍ ବିନା
pa: ਪੈਰਾਫ਼ਿਨ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez parafiny
pt: Sem parafina
ro: Fără parafină
ru: Без парафина
si: පැරෆින් රහිත
sk: Bez parafínu
sl: Brez parafina
sq: Pa parafinë
sr: Bez parafina
sv: Utan paraffin
sw: Bila parafini
ta: பாரஃபின் இல்லாமல்
te: పారాఫిన్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе парафин
th: ไม่มีพาราฟิน
tk: Parafinsiz
tl: Walang paraffin
tr: Parafinsiz
uk: Без парафіну
uz: Parafinsiz
vi: Không chứa parafin

en: Without EDTA, EDTA free, No EDTA
bg: Без EDTA
cs: Bez EDTA
da: Uden EDTA
de: Ohne EDTA
es: Sin EDTA
fr: Sans EDTA
it: Senza EDTA
ja: EDTA不使用
ko: EDTA 없음
nl: Zonder EDTA
pt: Sem EDTA

en: Good Environmental Choice
xx: Bra Miljöval
fr: Bon choix environnemental
sv: Bra Miljöval

en: Organic
de: Bio, Öko, Biologisch, Ökologisch, Kontrolliert biologisch, Kontrolliert ökologisch, biologische Landwirtschaft, ökologische Landwirtschaft, biologischer Landbau, ökologischer Landbau
es: Ecológico, Producto ecológico, Biológico, Producto biológico, Orgánico, Producto orgánico, Eco, Bio
fr: Bio, agriculture biologique, biologique, organic, organique, issu de l'agriculture biologique, ingrédients issus de l'agriculture biologique, Les-ingredients-sont-issus-d-une-agriculture-biologique
it: Biologico

en: Biodynamic agriculture
de: Biodynamische Landwirtschaft, Biodynamisch
es: Agricultura biodinámica
fr: Bio-dynamie, biodynamie, agriculture biodynamique, agriculture bio-dynamique, bio-dynamique

en: Demeter
de: Demeter
fr: Demeter, Association Demeter, Demeter France, Association Demeter France

en: India Organic
fr: Inde Biologique

en: Canada Organic, Biologique Canada Organic, Biologique Canada Canada Organic, Canada Organic Biologique Canada
fr: Biologique Canada, Biologique Canada Organic, Biologique Canada Canada Organic, Canada Organic Biologique Canada

en: Bioland
de: Bioland

en: Naturland
de: Naturland